Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 14 HEALTH FACILITIES
§ 39-1448. Acquisition of property.

The authority is authorized and empowered directly or by or through a participating health institution, as its agent, to acquire by purchase, lease, gift, devise or otherwise such lands, structures, property, real or personal, rights of way, franchises, easements, and other interests in lands, including lands lying under water and riparian rights which are located within or without the state as it may deem necessary or convenient for the construction or acquisition or operation of facilities but upon such terms as may be considered by the authority to be reasonable, and to take title thereto in the name of the authority or in the name of such participating health institution, as its agent.

§ 39-1448A. Notes.

The authority is authorized from time to time to issue its negotiable notes for any corporate purpose, including the payment of all or any part of the cost of any facility, and renew from time to time any notes by the issuance of new notes, whether the notes to be renewed have or have not matured. The authority may issue notes partly to renew notes or to discharge other obligations then outstanding and partly for any other purpose. The notes may be authorized, sold, executed and delivered in the same manner as bonds. Any resolution or resolutions authorizing notes of the authority or any issue thereof may contain any provisions which the authority is authorized to include in any resolution or resolutions authorizing bonds of the authority or any issue thereof, and the authority may include in any notes any terms, covenants or conditions which it is authorized to include in any bonds. All such notes shall be payable from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or from the revenues of the authority or other moneys available therefor and not otherwise pledged, subject only to any contractual rights of the holders of any of its notes or other obligations then outstanding.

§ 39-1449. Bonds.

The authority is authorized from time to time to issue its bonds in such principal amount as the authority shall determine for the purpose of financing all or a part of the cost of any facilities authorized hereby or for the refinancing of outstanding obligations. In anticipation of the sale of such bonds, the authority may issue bond anticipation notes and may renew the same from time to time. Such notes shall be paid from any revenues of the authority or other moneys available therefor and not otherwise pledged, or from the proceeds of sale of the bonds of the authority in anticipation of which they were issued. The notes shall be issued in the same manner as bonds. Such notes and the resolution or resolutions authorizing the same may contain any provisions, conditions or limitations which a bond resolution of the authority may contain.

The bonds may be issued as serial bonds or as term bonds or a combination of both types. All bonds issued by the authority shall be payable solely out of the revenues and receipts derived from the leasing, mortgaging or sale by the authority of the facilities concerned or of any part thereof as may be designated in the resolutions of the authority under which the bonds shall be authorized to be issued or as may be designated in a trust indenture authorized by the authority, which such trust indenture shall name a bank or trust company within or without the state of Idaho as trustee or from other moneys available therefor and not otherwise pledged. Such bonds may be executed and delivered by the authority at any time and from time to time, may be in such form and denominations and of such terms and maturities, may be in fully registered form or in bearer form registerable either as to principal or interest or both, may bear such conversion privileges and be payable in such instalments and at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date thereof, may be payable at such place or places whether within or without the state of Idaho, may bear interest at such rate or rates per annum as shall be determined by the authority and without regard to any interest rate limitation appearing in any other law, payable at such time or times and at such place or places and evidenced in such manner, may be executed by such officers of the authority, either manually or by facsimile, and coupon bonds shall have attached thereto interest coupons bearing the facsimile signature of an authorized officer of the authority and may contain such provisions not inconsistent herewith, all as shall be provided in the resolutions of the authority whereunder the bonds shall be authorized to be issued or as shall be provided in a trust indenture authorized by the authority. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, in the case of obligations maturing not later than one (1) year from the date of issuance thereof, the authority may authorize the executive director, associate executive director or any officer of the authority to fix principal amounts, maturity dates, interest rates, and purchase prices of any particular issue of such short-term obligations, subject to such limitations as to maximum term, maximum principal amount outstanding, and maximum interest rates as the authority shall prescribe by resolution. Any such authorization shall remain effective for the period of time designated in the resolution, regardless of whether the composition of the authority changes in the interim.

If deemed advisable by the authority there may be retained in the resolutions or the trust indenture under which any bonds of the authority are authorized to be issued an option to redeem all or any part thereof as may be specified in such resolutions or in such trust indenture, at such price or prices and after such notice or notices and on such terms and conditions as may be set forth in such resolutions or in such trust indenture, and as may be briefly recited on the face of the bonds, but nothing herein contained shall be construed to confer on the authority the right or option to redeem any bonds except as may be provided in the resolutions or in such trust indenture under which they shall be issued.

The bonds or notes of the authority may be sold at public or private sale for such price or prices and in such manner and from time to time as may be determined by the authority, and the authority may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions which it may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance thereof. The power to fix the date of sale of bonds and notes, to receive bids or proposals, to award and sell bonds and notes, and to take all other necessary action to sell and deliver bonds and notes may be delegated to the executive director of the authority by resolution of the authority. Pending preparation of the definitive bonds, the authority may issue interim receipts or certificates which shall be exchanged for such definitive bonds.

Issuance by the authority of one (1) or more series of bonds for one (1) or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other bonds in connection with the same facilities or any other facilities or any other purpose hereunder, but the resolutions or trust indenture whereunder any subsequent bonds may be issued shall recognize and protect any prior pledge or mortgage made for any prior issue of bonds. Any bonds of the authority at any time outstanding may at any time and from time to time be refunded by the authority by the issuance of its bonds for such purpose in such amount as the authority may deem necessary and, if deemed advisable by the authority, for the additional purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of constructing and acquiring additions, improvements, extensions or enlargements of a facility or any portion thereof.

§ 39-1450. Security for bonds and notes.

The principal of and interest on any bonds or notes issued by the authority may be secured by a pledge of, or security interest in, the revenues, rentals and receipts out of which the same may be made payable or from other moneys available therefor and not otherwise pledged or used as security and may be secured by a trust indenture or mortgage or deed of trust (including assignment of leases or other contract rights of the authority thereunder) covering all or any part of the facilities from which the revenues, rentals or receipts so pledged or used as security may be derived, including any enlargements of and additions to any such facilities thereafter made. The resolution under which the bonds are authorized to be issued and any such trust indenture, mortgage or deed of trust may contain any agreements and provisions which shall be a part of the contract with the holders of the bonds or notes to be authorized as to:

Pledging or providing a security interest in all or any part of the revenues of a facility or any revenue-producing contract or contracts made by the authority with any individual, partnership, corporation or association or other body, public or private, to secure the payment of the bonds or notes or of any particular issue of bonds, subject to such agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist;

Respecting the maintenance of the properties covered thereby;

The fixing and collection of rents, fees, and other charges to be charged, and the amounts to be raised in each year thereby, and the use and disposition of the revenues;

The setting aside, creation and maintenance of special and reserve funds and sinking funds and the use and disposition of the revenues;

Limitations on the right of the authority or its agent to restrict and regulate the use of facilities;

Limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of any issue of bonds or notes then or thereafter to be issued may be applied and pledging or providing a security interest in such proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds or notes or any issue of the bonds or notes;

Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured and the refunding of outstanding bonds;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders or noteholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds or notes the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

Limitations on the amount of moneys derived from a facility to be expended for operating, administrative or other expenses of the authority;

Defining the acts or omissions to act which shall constitute a default in the duties of the authority to holders of its obligations and providing the rights and remedies of such holders in the event of a default;

The mortgaging of a facility and the site thereof for the purpose of securing the bondholders or noteholders; and

Such other additional covenants, agreements, and provisions as are judged advisable or necessary by the authority for the security of the holders of such bonds or notes.
Any pledge made by the authority shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the revenues, moneys, or property so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded. Each pledge, agreement, lease, indenture, mortgage and deed of trust made for the benefit or security of any of the bonds of the authority shall continue effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the same were made shall have been fully paid or provision for such payment duly made. In the event of default in such payment or in any agreements of the authority made as a part of the contract under which the bonds were issued, whether contained in the resolutions authorizing the bonds or in any trust indenture, mortgage or deed of trust executed as security therefor, said payment or agreement may be enforced by suit, mandamus, the appointment of a receiver in equity or by foreclosure of any mortgage and deed of trust, or any one (1) or more of said remedies.

Notwithstanding any other provision of chapter 9, title 28, Idaho Code, to the contrary, this section expressly governs the creation, perfection, priority and enforcement of a security interest created by the Idaho health facilities authority.

In addition to the foregoing, bonds of the authority may be secured by a pooling of leases whereby the authority may assign its rights, as lessor, and pledge rents under two (2) or more leases of the facilities with two (2) or more participating health institutions, as lessees respectively, upon such terms as may be provided for in the resolutions of the authority or as may be provided for in a trust indenture authorized by the authority.

§ 39-1450A. Personal liability.

Neither the members of the authority nor any person executing the bonds or notes shall be liable personally on the bonds or notes or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

§ 39-1450B. Purchase.

The authority shall have power out of any funds available therefor to purchase its bonds or notes. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel or resell such bonds or notes, subject to and in accordance with agreements with bondholders or noteholders.

§ 39-1450C. Procedure before issuance of bonds. [Repealed.]

§ 39-1450D. Trust agreement to secure bonds.

In the discretion of the authority any bonds issued under this act may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the authority and a corporate trustee or trustees, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state of Idaho. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign the revenues to be received or proceeds of any contract or contracts pledged and may convey or mortgage the project or any portion thereof. Such trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper, and not in violation of law, including particularly such provisions as have been specifically authorized to be included in any resolution or resolutions of the authority authorizing bonds thereof. Any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state, which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues or other moneys, may furnish such indemnifying bonds or pledge such securities as may be required by the authority. Any such trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee or trustees, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition, any such trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of a facility.

§ 39-1451. Payment of bonds—Nonliability of state.

Bonds and notes issued by the authority shall not constitute or become an indebtedness, or a debt or liability of the state, the legislature thereof, or of any county, city, town, township, board of education or school district, or other subdivision of the state, or of any other political subdivision or body corporate and politic of or municipality within the state and neither the state, the legislature thereof, nor any county, city, town, township, board of education or school district or other subdivision of the state shall be liable thereon nor shall such bonds or notes constitute the giving, pledging or loaning of the faith and credit of the state, the legislature thereof, or of any county, city, town, township, board of education or school district, or other subdivision of the state, or of any other political subdivision or body corporate and politic of or municipality within the state, but shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided therefor. The issuance of bonds or notes under the provisions of this act shall not, directly or indirectly or contingently, obligate the state or any political subdivision thereof nor empower the authority, to levy or collect any form of taxes or assessments therefor or to create any indebtedness payable out of taxes or assessments or make any appropriation for their payment and such appropriation or levy is prohibited. Nothing in this section contained shall prevent or be construed to prevent the authority from pledging its full faith and credit or the full faith and credit of a participating health institution to the payment of bonds or notes authorized pursuant to this act. Nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize the authority to create a debt of the state within the meaning of the constitution or statutes of Idaho or authorize the authority to levy or collect taxes or assessments and all bonds issued by the authority pursuant to the provisions of this act are payable and shall state that they are payable solely from the funds pledged for their payment in accordance with the resolution authorizing their issuance or in any trust indenture or mortgage or deed of trust executed as security therefor and are not a debt or liability of the state of Idaho. The state shall not in any event be liable for the payment of the principal of or interest on any bonds of the authority or for the performance of any pledge, mortgage, obligation or agreement of any kind whatsoever which may be undertaken by the authority. No breach of any such pledge, mortgage, obligation or agreement shall impose any pecuniary liability upon the state or any charge upon its general credit or against its taxing power.

§ 39-1452. Exemption from taxation — Securities law.

The authority is hereby declared to be performing a public function for the benefit of the people of the state for the improvement of their health and living conditions and to be a public instrumentality of the state. Accordingly, the income or other revenues of the authority, and all properties at any time owned by the authority, and any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued under this act, their transfer and income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall be exempt at all times from all taxation in the state of Idaho. Also, bonds issued by the authority shall be exempt from the uniform securities act, chapter 14, title 30, Idaho Code, or any amendments thereto.

§ 39-1453. Rents and charges.

The authority is authorized to fix, revise, charge and collect rates, rents, fees and charges for the use of and for the services furnished or to be furnished by each facility and to contract with any person, partnership, association or corporation, or other body, public or private, in respect thereof. Such rates, rents, fees and charges shall be fixed and adjusted in respect of the aggregate of rates, rents, fees and charges from such facility so as to provide funds sufficient with other revenues or moneys available therefor, if any, to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing and operating the facility and each and every portion thereof, to the extent that the payment of such cost has not otherwise been adequately provided for, to pay the principal of and the interest on outstanding bonds or notes of the authority issued in respect of such facility as the same shall become due and payable, and to create and maintain reserves required or provided for in any resolution authorizing, or trust agreement securing, such bonds or notes of the authority. Such rates, rents, fees and charges shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any department, commission, board, body, bureau or agency of this state other than the authority. A sufficient amount of the revenues derived in respect of a facility, except such part of such revenues as may be necessary to pay the cost of maintenance, repair and operation and to provide reserves and for renewals, replacements, extensions, enlargements and improvements as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds or notes of the authority or in the trust agreement securing the same, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in such resolution or trust agreement in a sinking or other similar fund which is hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds or notes as the same shall become due, and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the rates, rents, fees and charges and other revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any trust agreement nor any other agreement nor any lease by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the authority. The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of such sinking or other similar fund shall be subject to the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or notes or of such trust agreement. Except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution or such trust agreement, such sinking or other similar fund may be a fund for all such bonds or notes issued to finance facilities at a particular health institution without distinction or priority of one over another, provided the authority in any such resolution or trust agreement may provide that such sinking or other similar fund shall be the fund for a particular facility at a health institution and for the bonds issued to finance a particular facility and may, additionally, permit and provide for the issuance of bonds having a subordinate lien in respect of the security herein authorized to other bonds of the authority, and, in such case, the authority may create separate sinking or other similar funds in respect of such subordinate lien bonds.

§ 39-1453A. Fees.

All expenses of the authority incurred in carrying out the provisions of this act shall be payable solely from funds provided under the authority of this act and no liability shall be incurred by the authority beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been provided under this act, except that for the purposes of meeting the necessary expenses of initial organization and operation until such date as the authority derives moneys from funds provided hereunder, the authority shall be empowered to borrow moneys as may be required for such necessary expenses of organization and operation. Such borrowed moneys shall be repaid within a reasonable time after the authority receives funds provided for under this act. When any application is made to the authority by any participating health institution for financial assistance to provide for its facilities, such application shall be accompanied by an “initial planning service fee” in an amount determined by the authority. Such initial planning service fees shall be included in the cost of the facilities to be financed and shall not be refundable by the authority whether or not any such application is approved. In addition to such initial fee, an “annual planning service fee” shall be paid to the authority by each participating health institution in an amount determined by the authority. Such annual planning service fee shall be paid on said dates or in installments as may be satisfactory to the authority. It is anticipated such fees shall be used for; (i) necessary expenses to determine the need of facilities in the area concerned and to that end the authority may utilize recognized voluntary and official health planning organizations and agencies at local, regional and state levels as well as the state statutory bodies having health planning responsibilities; (ii) necessary administrative expenses; and (iii) reserves for anticipated future expenses. In addition the authority may, for a negotiated fee, retain the services of any other public or private person, firm, partnership, association or corporation for the furnishing of services and data for use by the authority in determining the need and location of any such facilities for which application is being made or for such other services or surveys as the authority deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.

§ 39-1454. Conveyance of title to institution.

When the principal of (an) and interest on bonds issued by the authority to finance the cost of facilities or to refinance outstanding indebtedness of one or more participating health institutions, including any refunding bonds issued to refund and refinance such bonds, have been fully paid and retired or when adequate provision has been made to fully pay and retire the same, and all other conditions of the resolution, the lease, the trust indenture and the mortgage or deed of trust or any other form of security arrangement, if any, authorizing and securing the same have been satisfied and the lien of such mortgage or deed of trust or any other form of security arrangement has been released in accordance with the provisions thereof, the authority shall promptly do all things and execute such deeds and conveyances and other documents as are necessary and required to convey its right, title and interest in such facilities so financed, and any other facilities mortgaged or subject to deed of trust or any other form of security arrangement to secure the bonds, to such participating health institution or institutions.

§ 39-1455. Powers not restricted — Law complete in itself.

Neither this act nor anything herein contained shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which the authority might otherwise have under any laws of this state, but shall be construed as cumulative of any such powers. No proceedings, referendum, notice or approval shall be required for the creation of the authority or the issuance of any bonds or any instrument as security therefor, except as herein provided, any other law to the contrary notwithstanding; provided, that nothing herein shall be construed to deprive the state and its governmental subdivisions of their respective police powers over properties of the authority, or to impair any power thereover of any official or agency of the state and its governmental subdivisions which may be otherwise provided by law.

§ 39-1456. Facilities governed by laws of locality.

All facilities shall be subject to the planning, zoning, sanitary and building laws, ordinances and regulations applicable to the locality in which any such facilities are to be situated.

§ 39-1457. Investment of funds.

The authority may invest the proceeds from the sale of a series of obligations or any funds related to the series in such securities and other investments, whether or not any such investment or reinvestment is authorized under any other law of the state, as may be provided in the proceedings under which the series of obligations are authorized to be issued. The authority may invest any other funds in obligations of the federal government, the state or of any municipality thereof or obligations of agencies of the federal government; in bonds, notes, certificates of indebtedness, treasury bills or other securities constituting direct obligations of the United States of America; in certificates of deposit or time deposits constituting direct obligations of any bank in Idaho; provided, however, that investments may be made only in those certificates of deposit or time deposits in banks which are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation, if then in existence, and may exceed the maximum of such insurance; or in short term discount obligations of the federal national mortgage association. Any such securities may be purchased at the offering or market price thereof at the time of such purchase. The authority may invest any other funds with such maturities as the authority shall determine provided that such maturities are on a date or dates prior to the time when, in the judgment of the authority, the funds so invested will be required for expenditure. The express judgment of the authority as to the time when any such funds will be required for expenditure or be redeemable is final and conclusive.

§ 39-1457A. Trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this act whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds, notes or other obligations or as revenues or receipts shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this act. Any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes of this act, subject to such regulations as this act and the resolution authorizing the bonds, notes or other obligations of any issue or the trust agreement securing such obligations shall provide.

§ 39-1457B. Agreement of the state.

The state does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any bonds, notes and other obligations issued under this act, and with those parties who may enter into contracts with the authority pursuant to the provisions of this act, that the state will not limit, alter, restrict or impair the rights hereby vested in the authority to acquire, construct, reconstruct, maintain and operate any facility as defined in this act or to establish, revise, charge and collect rates, rents, fees and other charges as may be convenient or necessary to produce sufficient revenues to meet the expenses of maintenance and operation thereof and to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of bonds, notes or other obligations authorized and issued by this act, and with the parties who may enter into contracts with the authority pursuant to this act, or in any way impair the rights or remedies of the holders of such bonds, notes or other obligations of such parties until the bonds, notes and such other obligations, together with interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installment of interest and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of such holders, are fully met and discharged and such contracts are fully performed on the part of the authority. Nothing in this act precludes such limitation or alteration if and when adequate provision is made by law for the protection of the holders of such bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority or those entering into such contracts with the authority. The authority is authorized to include this pledge and undertaking for the state in such bonds, notes or other obligations and in such contracts.

§ 39-1458. Bonds eligible for investment.

The state and all counties, cities, villages, incorporated towns and other municipal corporations, political subdivisions and public bodies, and public officers of any thereof, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, insurance companies and associations, and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds issued pursuant to this act.

§ 39-1459. Exemption from construction and bidding requirements for public buildings.

The facilities are not subject to any requirements relating to public buildings, structures, grounds, works or improvements imposed by the laws of this state or any other similar requirements which may be lawfully waived by this section and any requirement of competitive bidding or other restriction imposed on the procedure for award of contracts for such purpose or the lease, sale or other disposition of property of the authority is not applicable to any action taken under authority of this act.

§ 39-1460. Powers in addition to those granted by other laws—Severability.

The powers conferred by this act shall be in addition and supplementary to, and the limitations by this act shall not affect the powers conferred by any other law except as herein provided. Facilities may be acquired, purchased, constructed, reconstructed, improved, bettered and extended and bonds may be issued under this act for said purposes notwithstanding that any other law may provide for the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment and extensions of like facilities, or the issuance of bonds for like purposes, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other law. If any one or more sections or provisions of this act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, shall ever be held by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the remaining provisions of this act and the application thereof to persons or circumstances other than those to which it is held to be invalid, shall not be affected thereby, it being the intention of this general assembly to enact the remaining provisions of this act notwithstanding such invalidity.